Nevada, session 83, SB355.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 701A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Agrivoltaics” means a system in which agricultural
activities, including, without limitation, crop production, livestock
production or beekeeping, occur underneath or between solar
panels.
Sec. 3. “Ecovoltaics” means a system in which conservation
activities, including, without limitation, native species
conservation, rangeland enhancement, soil improvement,
brownfield remediation or the fostering of pollinator habitats,
occur underneath or between solar panels.
Sec. 4. NRS 701A.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.300 As used in NRS 701A.300 to 701A.390, inclusive,
and sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 701A.305 to
701A.345, inclusive, and sections 2 and 3 of this act, have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. NRS 701A.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.365 1. The Director, in consultation with the Office of
Economic Development, shall approve an application for a partial
abatement pursuant to NRS 701A.300 to 701A.390, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, if the Director, in consultation with the
Office of Economic Development, makes the following
determinations:
(a) The applicant has executed an agreement with the Director
which must:
(1) State that the facility will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective, continue in operation in this State for
a period specified by the Director, which must be at least 10 years,
and will continue to meet the eligibility requirements for the
abatement; and
(2) Bind the successors in interest in the facility for the
specified period.
-
*SB355*

– 3 –
(b) The facility is registered pursuant to the laws of this State or
the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all other
permits required by the county, city or town in which the facility
operates.
(c) No funding is or will be provided by any governmental
entity in this State for the acquisition, design or construction of the
facility or for the acquisition of any land therefor, except any private
activity bonds as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 141.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), if the facility
will be located in a county whose population is 100,000 or more or a
city whose population is 60,000 or more, the facility meets the
following requirements:
(1) There will be 75 or more full-time employees working on
the construction of the facility during the second quarter of
construction, including, unless waived by the Director for good
cause, at least 50 percent who are residents of Nevada;
(2) Establishing the facility will require the facility to make a
capital investment of at least $10,000,000 in this State in capital
assets that will be retained at the location of the facility until at least
the date which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement
becomes effective;
(3) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the facility
to its employees in this State is at least 110 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, excluding management and administrative
employees, as established by the Employment Security Division of
the Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on
July 1 of each fiscal year; and
(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [6,] 7, the
average hourly wage of the employees working on the construction
of the facility will be at least 175 percent of the average statewide
hourly wage, excluding management and administrative employees,
as established by the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1
of each fiscal year and:
(I) The employees working on the construction of the
facility must be provided a health insurance plan that is provided by
a third-party administrator and includes health insurance coverage
for dependents of the employees; and
(II) The cost of the benefits provided to the employees
working on the construction of the facility will meet the minimum
requirements for benefits established by the Director by regulation
pursuant to NRS 701A.390.
(e) If the facility will be located in a county whose population is
less than 100,000, in an area of a county whose population is
100,000 or more that is located within the geographic boundaries of
-
*SB355*

– 4 –
an area that is designated as rural by the United States Department
of Agriculture and at least 20 miles outside of the geographic
boundaries of an area designated as urban by the United States
Department of Agriculture, or in a city whose population is less than
60,000, the facility meets the following requirements:
(1) There will be 50 or more full-time employees working on
the construction of the facility during the second quarter of
construction, including, unless waived by the Director for good
cause, at least 50 percent who are residents of Nevada;
(2) Establishing the facility will require the facility to make a
capital investment of at least $3,000,000 in this State in capital
assets that will be retained at the location of the facility until at least
the date which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement
becomes effective;
(3) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the facility
to its employees in this State is at least 110 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, excluding management and administrative
employees, as established by the Employment Security Division of
the Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on
July 1 of each fiscal year; and
(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [6,] 7, the
average hourly wage of the employees working on the construction
of the facility will be at least 175 percent of the average statewide
hourly wage, excluding management and administrative employees,
as established by the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1
of each fiscal year and:
(I) The employees working on the construction of the
facility must be provided a health insurance plan that is provided by
a third-party administrator and includes health insurance coverage
for dependents of the employees; and
(II) The cost of the benefits provided to the employees
working on the construction of the facility will meet the minimum
requirements for benefits established by the Director by regulation
pursuant to NRS 701A.390.
(f) [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
financial benefits that will result to this State from the employment
by the facility of the residents of this State and from capital
investments by the facility in this State will exceed the loss of tax
revenue that will result from the abatement.
(g) [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
facility is consistent with the State Plan for Economic Development
developed by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
-
*SB355*

– 5 –
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
Director shall not approve an application for a partial abatement of
the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS submitted
pursuant to NRS 701A.360 by a facility for the generation of
process heat from solar renewable energy, a wholesale facility for
the generation of electricity from renewable energy, a facility for the
storage of energy from renewable generation or a hybrid renewable
generation and energy storage facility unless the application is
approved or deemed approved pursuant to this subsection. The
board of county commissioners of a county must provide notice to
the Director that the board intends to consider an application and, if
such notice is given, must approve or deny the application not later
than 30 days after the board receives a copy of the application. The
board of county commissioners:
(a) Shall, in considering an application pursuant to this
subsection, make a recommendation to the Director regarding the
application;
(b) May, in considering an application pursuant to this
subsection, deny an application only if the board of county
commissioners determines, based on relevant information, that:
(1) The projected cost of the services that the local
government is required to provide to the facility will exceed the
amount of tax revenue that the local government is projected to
receive as a result of the abatement; or
(2) The projected financial benefits that will result to the
county from the employment by the facility of the residents of this
State and from capital investments by the facility in the county will
not exceed the projected loss of tax revenue that will result from the
abatement;
(c) Must not condition the approval of the application on a
requirement that the facility agree to purchase, lease or otherwise
acquire in its own name or on behalf of the county any
infrastructure, equipment, facilities or other property in the county
that is not directly related to or otherwise necessary for the
construction and operation of the facility; and
(d) May, without regard to whether the board has provided
notice to the Director of its intent to consider the application, make a
recommendation to the Director regarding the application.
 If the board of county commissioners does not approve or deny
the application within 30 days after the board receives from the
Director a copy of the application, the application shall be deemed
approved.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, the Director,
in consultation with the Office of Economic Development, may, if
-
*SB355*

– 6 –
the Director, in consultation with the Office, determines that such
action is necessary:
(a) Approve an application for a partial abatement for a facility
that does not meet any requirement set forth in subparagraph (1) or
(2) of paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subparagraph (1) or (2) of
paragraph (e) of subsection 1; or
(b) Add additional requirements that a facility must meet to
qualify for a partial abatement.
4. The provisions of paragraphs (f) and (g) of subsection 1
and subsection 2 do not apply to an application if, for the duration
of the abatement, not less than 36 percent of the total area of the
facility will be devoted to agrivoltaics, ecovoltaics or both
agrivoltaics and ecovoltaics.
5. The Director shall cooperate with the Office of Economic
Development in carrying out the provisions of this section.
[5.] 6. The Director shall submit to the Office of Economic
Development an annual report, at such a time and containing such
information as the Office may require, regarding the partial
abatements granted pursuant to this section.
[6.] 7. The provisions of subparagraph (4) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 and subparagraph (4) of paragraph (e) of subsection 1
concerning the average hourly wage of the employees working on
the construction of a facility do not apply to the wages of an
apprentice as that term is defined in NRS 610.010.
[7.] 8. As used in this section, “wage” or “wages”:
(a) Means:
(1) The basic hourly rate of pay; and
(2) The amount of any hourly contribution made to a third-
party administrator pursuant to a pension plan or vacation plan
which is for the benefit of the employee.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a), does not
include the amount of any health insurance plan, pension or other
bona fide fringe benefits which are a benefit to the employee.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, and expires
by limitation on June 30, 2049.
H
-
*SB355*